Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.510

Statewide 911 communications systems—Funding by counties—State patrol public safety answering point.

(1) Each county, singly or in combination with one or more counties, must provide or participate in countywide or multicounty-wide 911 emergency communications systems so that 911 is available throughout the state. The county must provide funding for the 911 communications system in the county in an amount equal to the amount the maximum tax under RCW 82.14B.030(1) would generate in the county less any applicable administrative fee charged by the department of revenue or the amount necessary to provide full funding of the system in the county. The state 911 coordination office established by RCW 38.52.520 must assist and facilitate 911 implementation throughout the state.

(2) A county may request a Washington state patrol public safety answering point to become a primary public safety answering point and receive 911 calls from a specific geographical area and may cancel that designation at any time.

[ 2022 c 203 s 8; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 14; 1991 c 54 s 3.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Referral to electorate—1991 c 54: See note following RCW 38.52.030.